Maryland, session 2026, SB0085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–309.
(a) There is an Information Technology Investment Fund.
(l) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section and in accordance with
paragraph (2) of this subsection, money paid into the Fund under subsection (e)(2) of this
section:
(I) shall be used to support:
[(i)] 1. the State telecommunication and computer network
established under § 3.5–404 of this title, including program development for these
activities; and
– 1 –

Ch. 436 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii)] 2. the Statewide Public Safety Interoperability Radio
System, also known as Maryland First (first responder interoperable radio system team),
under Title 1, Subtitle 5 of the Public Safety Article; AND
(II) AT THE SECRETARY’S DISCRETION, MAY BE USED TO
SUPPORT STATE–OWNED COMMUNICATION SITES, COMMUNICATIONS FACILITIES,
AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT USED IN CONNECTION WITH
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY AGREEMENTS ENTERED INTO UNDER § 3.5–307 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING PROGRAM MANAGEMENT FOR THESE ACTIVITIES.
(2) The Secretary may determine the portion of the money paid into the
Fund that shall be allocated to each program described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) (I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 15 EACH YEAR, THE SECRETARY
SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, SPECIFYING THE AMOUNT OF
MONEY PAID INTO THE FUND THAT WAS ALLOCATED TO EACH PROGRAM DESCRIBED
IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL
INCLUDE HOW FUNDS WERE ALLOCATED AT THE SECRETARY’S DISCRETION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2031,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –